Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8587.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Coverage for hormonal and non-hormonal therapy to treat the symptoms
of peri-menopause and menopause.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary hormone therapy treatment to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause and
menopause.
(b) Coverage for hormone replacement therapy to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause
and menopause under this section shall mean at least one federal Food and Drug Administration-
approved hormonal and non-hormonal treatment, and at least one hormonal replacement therapy
option in each of the following modalities: oral, transdermal, topical, and vaginal.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Coverage for hormonal and non-hormonal therapy to treat the symptoms
of peri-menopause and menopause.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary hormone therapy treatment to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause and

menopause.
(b) Coverage for hormone replacement therapy to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause
and menopause under this section shall mean at least one federal Food and Drug Administration-
approved hormonal and non-hormonal treatment, and at least one hormonal replacement therapy
option in each of the following modalities: oral, transdermal, topical, and vaginal.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Coverage for hormonal and non-hormonal therapy to treat the symptoms
of peri-menopause and menopause.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary hormone therapy treatment to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause and
menopause.
(b) Coverage for hormone replacement therapy to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause
and menopause under this section shall mean at least one federal Food and Drug Administration-
approved hormonal and non-hormonal treatment, and at least one hormonal replacement therapy
option in each of the following modalities: oral, transdermal, topical, and vaginal.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Coverage for hormonal and non-hormonal therapy to treat the symptoms
of peri-menopause and menopause.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary hormone therapy treatment to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause and
menopause.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary hormone therapy treatment to treat the symptoms of peri-menopause and
menopause.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006501
========
LC006501 - Page 2 of 3